Washington statutes.
RCW 39.08.065

Notice to contractor condition to suit on bond when supplies are furnished to subcontractor.

Every person, firm, or corporation furnishing materials, supplies, or provisions to be used in the construction, performance, carrying on, prosecution, or doing of any work for the state, or any county, city, town, district, municipality, or other public body, shall, not later than ten days after the date of the first delivery of such materials, supplies, or provisions to any subcontractor or agent of any person, firm, or corporation having a subcontract for the construction, performance, carrying on, prosecution, or doing of such work, deliver or mail to the contractor a notice in writing stating in substance and effect that such person, firm, or corporation has commenced to deliver materials, supplies, or provisions for use thereon, with the name of the subcontractor or agent ordering or to whom the same is furnished and that such contractor and his or her bond will be held for the payment of the same, and no suit or action shall be maintained in any court against the contractor or his or her bond to recover for such material, supplies, or provisions or any part thereof unless the provisions of this section have been complied with.

[ 2011 c 336 s 804; 1915 c 167 s 1; RRS s 1159-1. Formerly RCW 39.08.020.]